dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX R   iasť        aďte       priasť
SFX R   sť          dol        priasť
SFX R   sť          dla        priasť
SFX R   sť          dlo        priasť
SFX R   sť          dli        priasť
SFX R   iasť        asiem      triasť
SFX R   iasť        asieš      triasť
SFX R   iasť        asie       triasť
SFX R   iasť        asieme     triasť
SFX R   iasť        asiete     triasť
SFX R   iasť        asú        triasť
SFX R   iasť        asúc       triasť
SFX R   iasť        as         triasť
SFX R   iasť        asme       triasť
SFX R   iasť        aste       triasť
SFX R   sť          sol        triasť
SFX R   sť          sla        triasť
SFX R   sť          slo        triasť
SFX R   sť          sli        triasť
SFX R   iesť        esiem      niesť
SFX R   iesť        esieš      niesť
SFX R   iesť        esie       niesť
SFX R   iesť        esieme     niesť
SFX R   iesť        esiete     niesť
SFX R   iesť        esú        niesť
SFX R   iesť        esúc       niesť
SFX R   iesť        es         niesť
SFX R   iesť        esme       niesť
SFX R   iesť        este       niesť
SFX R   sť          sol        niesť
SFX R   sť          sla        niesť
SFX R   sť          slo        niesť
SFX R   sť          sli        niesť
SFX R   iesť        ediem      viesť
SFX R   iesť        edieš      viesť
SFX R   iesť        edie       viesť
SFX R   iesť        edieme     viesť
SFX R   iesť        ediete     viesť
SFX R   iesť        edú        viesť
SFX R   iesť        edúc       viesť
SFX R   iesť        eď         viesť
SFX R   iesť        eďme       viesť
SFX R   iesť        eďte       viesť
SFX R   sť          dol        viesť
SFX R   sť          dla        viesť
SFX R   sť          dlo        viesť
SFX R   sť          dli        viesť
SFX R   iesť        etiem      [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        etieš      [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        etie       [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        etieme     [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        etiete     [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        etú        [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        etúc       [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        eť         [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        eťme       [^nv]iesť
SFX R   iesť        eťte       [^nv]iesť
SFX R   sť          tol        [^nv]iesť
SFX R   sť          tla        [^nv]iesť
SFX R   sť          tlo        [^nv]iesť
SFX R   sť          tli        [^nv]iesť
SFX R   sť          m          [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          š          [^i]esť
SFX R   esť         e          [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          me         [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          te         [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dia        [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          diac       [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dz         [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dzme       [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dzte       [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dol        [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dla        [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dlo        [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dli        [^i]esť
SFX R   sť          dem        .[íj]sť
SFX R   sť          deš        .[íj]sť
SFX R   sť          de         .[íj]sť
SFX R   sť          deme       .[íj]sť
SFX R   sť          dete       .[íj]sť
SFX R   sť          du         .[íj]sť
SFX R   sť          dúc        .[íj]sť
SFX R   sť          ď          .ísť
SFX R   sť          ďme        .ísť
SFX R   sť          ďte        .ísť
SFX R   ísť         išiel      ísť
SFX R   ísť         išla       ísť
SFX R   ísť         išlo       ísť
SFX R   ísť         išli       ísť
SFX R   sť          di         ájsť
SFX R   sť          dimme      ájsť
SFX R   sť          dite       ájsť
SFX R   ájsť        ašiel      ájsť
SFX R   ájsť        ašla       ájsť
SFX R   ájsť        ašlo       ájsť
SFX R   ájsť        ašli       ájsť
SFX R   ôjsť        ošiel      ôjsť
SFX R   ôjsť        ošla       ôjsť
SFX R   ôjsť        ošlo       ôjsť
SFX R   ôjsť        ošli       ôjsť
SFX R   jsť         šiel       jsť
SFX R   jsť         šla        jsť
SFX R   jsť         šlo        jsť
SFX R   jsť         šli        jsť
SFX R   úsť         udiem      úsť
SFX R   úsť         udieš      úsť
SFX R   úsť         udie       úsť
SFX R   úsť         udieme     úsť
SFX R   úsť         udiete     úsť
SFX R   úsť         udú        úsť
SFX R   úsť         udúc       úsť
SFX R   úsť         uď         úsť
SFX R   úsť         uďme       úsť
SFX R   úsť         uďte       úsť
SFX R   sť          dol        úsť
SFX R   sť          dla        úsť
SFX R   sť          dlo        úsť
SFX R   sť          dli        úsť
SFX R   núť         niem       núť
SFX R   núť         nieš       núť
SFX R   núť         nie        núť
SFX R   núť         nieme      núť
SFX R   núť         niete      núť
SFX R   núť         nú         núť
SFX R   núť         núc        núť
SFX R   núť         ň          núť
SFX R   núť         ňme        núť
SFX R   núť         ňte        núť
SFX R   núť         nul        núť
SFX R   núť         nula       núť
SFX R   núť         nulo       núť
SFX R   núť         nuli       núť
SFX R   iezť        ežiem      riezť
SFX R   iezť        ežieš      riezť
SFX R   iezť        ežie       riezť
SFX R   iezť        ežieme     riezť
SFX R   iezť        ežiete     riezť
SFX R   iezť        ežú        riezť
SFX R   iezť        ežúc       riezť
SFX R   iezť        ež         riezť
SFX R   iezť        ežme       riezť
SFX R   iezť        ežte       riezť
SFX R   iezť        eziem      [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        ezieš      [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        ezie       [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        ezieme     [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        eziete     [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        ezú        [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        ezúc       [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        ez         [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        ezme       [^r]iezť
SFX R   iezť        ezte       [^r]iezť
SFX R   ť           ol         [^r]iezť
SFX R   ť           la         [^r]iezť
SFX R   ť           lo         [^r]iezť
SFX R   ť           li         [^r]iezť
SFX R   ť           ol         [^i]ezť
SFX R   ť           la         [^i]ezť
SFX R   ť           lo         [^i]ezť
SFX R   ť           li         [^i]ezť
SFX R   ť           iem        [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           ieš        [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           ie         [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           ieme       [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           iete       [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           ú          [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           úc         [^eý]zť
SFX R   zť          z          [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           me         [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           te         [^eý]zť
SFX R   ť           ol         [^e]zť
SFX R   ť           la         [^e]zť
SFX R   ť           lo         [^e]zť
SFX R   ť           li         [^e]zť
SFX R   ýzť         yziem      ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yzieš      ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yzie       ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yzieme     ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yziete     ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yzú        ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yzúc       ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yz         ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yzme       ýzť
SFX R   ýzť         yzte       ýzť

SFX b Y 6  # v testovaní: pred podst. mena vzoru dub s -u v G a -e L
SFX b   0           u          [klr]
SFX b   0           om         [klr]
SFX b   0           y          [klr]
SFX b   0           ov         [klr]
SFX b   0           och        [klr]
SFX b   0           mi         [klr]

SFX č Y 10  # v testovaní: pre číslovky
SFX č   0           násobný    .
SFX č   0           násobných  .
SFX č   0           násobnými  .
SFX č   0           násobná    .
SFX č   0           násobné    .
SFX č   0           násobní    .
SFX č   0           násobny    .
SFX č   0           násobna    .
SFX č   0           násobne    .
SFX č   0           násobni    .
